de: Steifigkeitsgrad der Einlage: Extrafest; Extraweich; Fest; Mittel; Weich; Sonstige
ja: 界面剛性レベル: 極ハード; 極ソフト; ハード; ミディアム; ソフト; その他
fr: Degré de rigidité de l’entoilage: Extra ferme; Extra souple; Ferme; Moyen; Souple; Autre
cs: Úroveň tuhosti rozhraní: Extra pevná; Extra měkká; Pevná; Střední; Měkká; Jiné
nl: Vlieseline stijfheidsniveau: Extra stevig; Extra zacht; Stevig; Medium; Zacht; Overig
es: Nivel de rigidez de la entretela: Extra firme; Extra suave; Firme; Medio; Suave; Otro
sv: Styvhetsnivå för mellanlägg: Extra fast; Extra mjuk; Fast; Medium; Mjuk; Annat
zh-TW: 襯布硬挺度: 特硬; 特軟; 硬; 中等; 軟; 其他
fi: Tukikankaan jäykkyys: Erittäin jämäkkä; Erittäin pehmeä; Jämäkkä; Keskitaso; Pehmeä; Muu
pt-PT: Nível de rigidez da entretela: Extrafirme; Extramacio; Firme; Médio; Macio; Outro
sk-SK: Úroveň tuhosti podšívky: Extra pevná; Extra mäkká; Pevná; Stredná; Mäkká; Iné
pt-BR: Nível de rigidez da entretela: Extra firme; Extra macio; Firme; Médio; Macio; Outro
hu: Közbélés merevségi szintje: Extra erős tartású; Extra puha; Erős tartású; Közepes; Puha; Egyéb
en: Interfacing stiffness level: Extra firm; Extra soft; Firm; Medium; Soft; Other
tr: Arayüz sertlik seviyesi: Ekstra sert; Ekstra yumuşak; Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
nb: Stivhetsnivå for grensesnitt: Ekstra stiv; Ekstra myk; Stiv; Medium; Myk; Annet
lt-LT: Paklijavimo medžiagos standumo lygis: Labai standus; Labai minkštas; Standus; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Kita
ru: Уровень жесткости прокладочного материала: Очень жесткий; Очень мягкий; Жесткий; Средний; Мягкий; Другое
ro-RO: Nivelul de rigiditate al interfeței: Foarte ferm; Foarte moale; Ferm; Mediu; Moale; Altele
it: Livello di rigidità dell'interfodera: Extra rigida; Extra morbida; Rigida; Media; Morbida; Altro
sl-SI: Stopnja togosti medvloge: Zelo močno; Zelo mehko; Močno; Srednje; Mehko; Drugo
th: ระดับความแข็งของผ้าซับใน: แข็งเป็นพิเศษ; นุ่มเป็นพิเศษ; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
vi: Độ cứng vải lót: Cực cứng; Cực mềm; Cứng; Trung bình; Mềm; Khác
hr-HR: Razina krutosti međupovršine: Iznimno kruto; Iznimno meko; Kruto; Srednje kruto; Meko; Ostalo
da: Stivhedsniveau for mellemfor: Ekstra fast; Ekstra blød; Fast; Medium; Blød; Andet
ko: 심지 강도 수준: 매우 단단함; 매우 부드러움; 단단함; 보통; 부드러움; 기타
bg-BG: Ниво на твърдост на подлепващия материал: Изключително твърдо; Изключително меко; Твърдо; Средно; Меко; Други
el: Επίπεδο ακαμψίας ενισχυτικού υφάσματος: Πολύ σκληρό; Πολύ μαλακό; Σκληρό; Μεσαίο; Μαλακό; Άλλο
pl: Poziom sztywności interfejsu: Bardzo sztywny; Bardzo miękki; Sztywny; Średni; Miękki; Inny
zh-CN: 粘合衬硬度等级: 超硬; 超软; 硬挺; 中等; 柔软; 其他